Hawaii, session 2025, SB1427.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that Act 263, Session Laws of Hawaii 2023, amended regulations on hemp production and manufactured hemp products.  However, the definition of "manufactured hemp product" in section 328G-1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, was inadvertently amended to be ambiguous and may be read to limit the department of health's rulemaking authority to regulate new types of hemp products as manufactured hemp products. The purpose of the Act is to clarify that the definition of "manufactured hemp product" includes hemp products specified in rules adopted by the department of health pursuant to section 328G-4, Hawaii Revised Statutes. SECTION 2.  Section 328G-1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending the definition of "manufactured hemp product" to read as follows: ""Manufactured hemp product" means [a]: (1)  A product created by processing, as defined in this chapter, that[: (1)  Is] is either: (A)  Intended to be consumed orally to supplement the human or animal diet in tablet, capsule, powder, softgel, gelcap, or liquid form (e.g., hemp oil); or (B)  In a form for topical application to the skin or hair; or (2)  Any other product specified in rules adopted by the department pursuant to section 328G-4. [(2)  Does] "Manufactured hemp product" does not include any living hemp plants, viable seeds, leaf materials, or floral materials[; and (3)  Includes any other product specified by the department pursuant to section 328G-4(a)(7)]." SECTION 3.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________ BY REQUEST